Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB171.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 121.015 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Registry" means the Kentucky Registry of Election Finance;
(2) "Election" means any primary, regular, or special election to fill vacancies
regardless of whether a candidate or slate of candidates is opposed or unopposed in
an election. Each primary, regular, or special election shall be considered a separate
election;
(3) "Committee" includes the following:
(a) "Campaign committee," which means one (1) or more persons who receive
contributions and make expenditures to support or oppose one (1) or more
specific candidates or slates of candidates for nomination or election to any
state, county, city, or district office, that is authorized by the candidate or slate
of candidates to receive contributions, make expenditures, and generally
conduct a campaign for the candidate or slate of candidates, but does not
include an entity established solely by a candidate which is managed solely by
a candidate and a campaign treasurer and whose name is generic in nature,
such as "Friends of (the candidate)," and does not reflect that other persons
have structured themselves as a committee, designated officers of the
committee, and assigned responsibilities and duties to each officer with the
purpose of managing a campaign to support or oppose a candidate in an
election;
(b) "Independent expenditure-only committee," which means one (1) or more
persons who receive unlimited contributions for the purpose of making only
independent expenditures to support or oppose one (1) or more specific
candidates or slates of candidates for nomination or election to any state,
Page 1 of 11
XXXX 12/22/2025 1:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 330
county, city, or district office;
(c) "Caucus campaign committee," which means members of one (1) of the
following caucus groups who receive contributions and make expenditures to
support or oppose one (1) or more specific candidates or slates of candidates
for nomination or election, or a committee:
1. House Democratic caucus campaign committee;
2. House Republican caucus campaign committee;
3. Senate Democratic caucus campaign committee;
4. Senate Republican caucus campaign committee; or
5. Subdivisions of the state executive committee of a minor political party,
which serve the same function as the above-named committees, as
determined by regulations promulgated by the registry;
(d) "Political issues committee," which means three (3) or more persons joining
together to advocate or oppose a ballot measure if that committee receives or
expends money in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000);
(e) "Permanent committee," which means a group of individuals, including an
association, committee, or organization, other than a campaign committee,
independent expenditure-only committee, federally registered political
committee, political issues committee, inaugural committee, caucus campaign
committee, or party executive committee, which is established as, or intended
to be, a permanent organization having as a primary purpose expressly
advocating the election or defeat of one (1) or more clearly identified
candidates, slates of candidates, or political parties, which functions on a
regular basis throughout the year;
(f) An executive committee of a political party; and
(g) "Inaugural committee," which means one (1) or more persons who receive
contributions and make expenditures in support of inauguration activities for
Page 2 of 11
XXXX 12/22/2025 1:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 330
any candidate or slate of candidates elected to any state, county, city, or
district office;
(4) "Contributing organization" means a group which merely contributes to candidates,
slates of candidates, campaign committees, caucus campaign committees, or
executive committees from time to time from funds derived solely from within the
group, and which does not solicit or receive funds from sources outside the group
itself. Any contributions made by the groups in excess of one hundred dollars
($100) shall be reported to the registry;
(5) "Testimonial affair" means an affair held in honor of a person who holds or who is
or was a candidate for nomination or election to a political office in this state
designed to raise funds for any purpose not charitable, religious, or educational;
(6) "Contribution" means any:
(a) Payment, distribution, loan, deposit, or gift of money or other thing of value,
to a candidate, his or her agent, a slate of candidates, its authorized agent, a
committee, or contributing organization. As used in this subsection, "loan"
shall include a guarantee, endorsement, or other form of security where the
risk of nonpayment rests with the surety, guarantor, or endorser, as well as
with a committee, contributing organization, candidate, slate of candidates, or
other primary obligor. No person shall become liable as surety, endorser, or
guarantor for any sum in any one (1) election which, when combined with all
other contributions the individual makes to a candidate, his or her agent, a
slate of candidates, its agent, a committee, or a contributing organization,
exceeds the contribution limits provided in KRS 121.150;
(b) Payment by any person other than the candidate, his or her authorized
treasurer, a slate of candidates, its authorized treasurer, a committee, or a
contributing organization, of compensation for the personal services of
another person which are rendered to a candidate, slate of candidates,
Page 3 of 11
XXXX 12/22/2025 1:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 330
committee, or contributing organization, or for inauguration activities;
(c) Goods, advertising, or services with a value of more than one hundred dollars
($100) in the aggregate in any one (1) election which are furnished to a
candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or contributing organization or for
inauguration activities without charge, or at a rate which is less than the rate
normally charged for the goods or services; or
(d) Payment by any person other than a candidate, his or her authorized treasurer,
a slate of candidates, its authorized treasurer, a committee, or contributing
organization for any goods or services with a value of more than one hundred
dollars ($100) in the aggregate in any one (1) election which are utilized by a
candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or contributing organization, or for
inauguration activities;
(7) Notwithstanding the foregoing meanings of "contribution," the word shall not be
construed to include:
(a) Services provided without compensation by individuals volunteering a portion
or all of their time on behalf of a candidate, a slate of candidates, committee,
or contributing organization;
(b) A loan of money by any financial institution doing business in Kentucky
made in accordance with applicable banking laws and regulations and in the
ordinary course of business; or
(c) An independent expenditure by any individual or permanent committee;
(8) "Candidate" means any person who has received contributions or made
expenditures, has appointed a campaign treasurer, or has given his or her consent
for any other person to receive contributions or make expenditures with a view to
bringing about his or her nomination or election to a nonfederal public office,
except as provided in KRS 121.180(10)(b);
(9) "Slate of candidates" means:
Page 4 of 11
XXXX 12/22/2025 1:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 330
(a) Between the time a certificate or petition of nomination has been filed for a
candidate for the office of Governor under KRS 118.365 and the time the
candidate designates a running mate for the office of Lieutenant Governor
under KRS 118.126, a slate of candidates consists of the candidate for the
office of Governor; and
(b) After that candidate has designated a running mate under KRS 118.126, that
same slate of candidates consists of that same candidate for the office of
Governor and the candidate's running mate for the office of Lieutenant
Governor. Unless the context requires otherwise, any provision of law that
applies to a candidate shall also apply to a slate of candidates;
(10) "Knowingly" means, with respect to conduct or to a circumstance described by a
statute defining an offense, that a person is aware or should have been aware that
his or her conduct is of that nature or that the circumstance exists;
(11) "Fundraiser" means an individual who directly solicits and secures contributions on
behalf of a candidate or slate of candidates for a statewide-elected state office or an
office in a jurisdiction with a population in excess of two hundred thousand
(200,000) residents;
(12) "Independent expenditure" means:
(a) The expenditure of money or other things of value for a communication which
expressly advocates the election or defeat of a clearly identified candidate or
slate of candidates, and which:
1. Is made without any coordination, consultation, or cooperation with any
candidate, slate of candidates, campaign committee, or any authorized
person acting on behalf of any of them; and
2. Is not made in concert with, or at the request or suggestion of any
candidate, slate of candidates, campaign committee, or any authorized
person acting on behalf of any of them; or
Page 5 of 11
XXXX 12/22/2025 1:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 330
(b) The expenditure of money or other things of value for a communication which
expressly advocates or opposes a ballot measure, and which:
1. Is made without any coordination, consultation, or cooperation with any
political issues committee, or any authorized person acting on behalf of
a political issues committee; and
2. Is not made in concert with, or at the request or suggestion of, any
political issues committee, or any authorized person acting on behalf of
a political issues committee;
(13) "Electronic reporting" means the use of technology, having electrical, digital,
magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities, by which an
individual or other entity submits, compiles, or transmits campaign finance reports
to the registry, or by which the registry receives, stores, analyzes, or discloses the
reports;
(14) "Security procedure" means a procedure employed for the purpose of verifying that
an electronic signature, record, or performance is that of a specific person or for
detecting changes or errors in the information in an electronic record. The term
includes a procedure that requires the use of algorithms or other codes, identifying
words or numbers, encryption, or callback or other acknowledgment procedures;
(15) "Electronic signature" means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or
logically associated with a record and executed or adopted by a person with the
intent to sign the record;
(16) "Filer" means any candidate, a slate of candidates, committee, or other individual or
entity required to submit financial disclosure reports to the registry;
(17) "Filer-side software" means software provided to or used by the filer that enables
transmittal of financial reports to the registry;
(18) "Form" means an online web page or an electronic document designed to capture,
validate, and submit data for processing to the registry, unless the context otherwise
Page 6 of 11
XXXX 12/22/2025 1:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 330
prescribes;
(19) "Reasonable cause" means an event, happening, or circumstance entirely beyond
the knowledge or control of the candidate, slate of candidates, or committee, which
has exercised due care and prudence in maintaining the records of the campaign or
committee pursuant to statute or administrative regulation;
(20) "Foreign national" means:
(a) An individual who is not a citizen or lawful permanent resident of the United
States;
(b) A government, political subdivision, or municipality of a foreign country;
(c) A foreign political party;
(d) Any entity, including but not limited to a partnership, association, corporation,
organization, or other combination of persons, that is organized under the
laws of or has its principal place of business in a foreign country; or
(e) Any entity in the United States, including but not limited to a partnership,
association, corporation, or organization that is wholly or majority owned by
any foreign national, unless:
1. Any contribution or expenditure the entity makes derives entirely from
funds generated by the entity's United States operations; and
2. All decisions concerning the contribution or expenditure, except for
setting overall budget amounts, are made by individuals who are United
States citizens or permanent residents;
(21) "Ballot measure" means a question, other than the nomination or election of a
candidate for public office, which has been:
(a) Approved by a political subdivision or the General Assembly and is required
by law to be placed before the voters of the territory affected; or
(b) Initiated or referred by citizen petition as authorized by KRS 242.020 and
placed before the voters of the territory affected;
Page 7 of 11
XXXX 12/22/2025 1:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 330
(22) "Preliminary activity" includes but is not limited to:
(a) Participating in focus groups;
(b) Making telephone calls;
(c) Traveling;
(d) Conducting polls; and
(e) Drafting ballot measure language;[ and]
(23) "Tax-exempt organization" means an organization described in 26 U.S.C. sec.
501(c) and exempt from federal taxation under 26 U.S.C. sec. 501(a). This
subsection shall not be construed to treat a political organization under 26 U.S.C.
sec. 527 as a tax-exempt organization for purposes of this chapter; and
(24) "Campaign consultant" means any person or entity that provides one (1) or more
of the following services for pay: social media and legacy media strategy, creating
and buying ads and other branded material, research and polling, analyzing and
collecting data, voter targeting and field planning, fundraising, writing press
releases, organizing campaign rallies and events, or writing speeches. A
registered agent shall be considered a campaign consultant if the registered agent
provides any of the above services with or without pay. A person or entity
convicted of fraud, bribery, or electioneering shall be prohibited from serving as a
campaign consultant.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 121 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Each campaign consultant and employer, within seven (7) days following
engagement of a campaign consultant, shall file with the registry an initial
registration statement listing the following:
(a) The name, business address, telephone number, and occupation of the
campaign consultant;
(b) The name, brief description of the nature of the business, nature and
Page 8 of 11
XXXX 12/22/2025 1:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 330
identity of the organized association, coalition, or public interest entity, and
business address and telephone number of the employer. For the purposes
of this section, if a trade association or other charitable or fraternal
organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under Section
501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code is the employer, the statement shall not
list the names and addresses of each member of the association or
organization, if the association or organization itself is listed;
(c) The date on which the campaign consultant was engaged; and
(d) Certification by the employer and campaign consultant that the information
contained in the registration statement is complete and accurate.
(2) The registration shall be valid through the next thirty-first day of December of an
odd-numbered year, unless previously terminated.
(3) (a) In addition to the initial registration statement required by subsection (1) of
this section, each campaign consultant and employer shall file an updated
registration statement with the registry to be received by the registry, not
later than 4 p.m. on the fifteenth day of January, February, March, April,
May, and September of each year, for the period since the end of the period
covered by the previous report until the last day of the month preceding the
filing date. The registry may grant a reasonable extension of time for filing
the updated registration statement for good cause shown.
(b) The updated registration statement shall confirm the continuing existence
of each engagement described in an initial registration statement.
(4) If a campaign consultant is engaged by more than one (1) employer, the
consultant shall file a separate initial and updated registration statement for each
engagement. If an employer engages more than one (1) campaign consultant, the
employer shall file only one (1) updated registration statement under subsection
(3) of this section, which shall contain the information required by subsection (3)
Page 9 of 11
XXXX 12/22/2025 1:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 330
of this section regarding all campaign consultants engaged by the employer.
(5) (a) A change in any information required by subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this
section shall be reflected in the next updated registration statement filed
under subsection (3) of this section.
(b) Within thirty (30) days after the termination of an engagement, the
campaign consultant who was employed under the engagement shall file
written notice of the termination with the registry.
(c) If the termination of a campaign consultant leaves an employer without the
engagement of any campaign consultants, within thirty (30) days after the
termination, the employer shall file written notice with the registry of its
intent to terminate its current registration.
(6) Upon registration pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the campaign
consultant shall be issued a card by the registry, showing that the campaign
consultant is registered. The registration card shall be valid from the date of its
issuance through the next thirty-first day of December of an odd-numbered year.
(7) Any campaign consultant or employer who fails to file the initial registration
statement or updated registration statement, or who fails to remedy a deficiency
in any filing in a timely manner, may be fined by the registry an amount not to
exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per day, up to a maximum total fine of one
thousand dollars ($1,000), without the necessity of a complaint being filed, but
only after notice has been given to the alleged violator of the intent of the registry
to impose a fine, including the amount of the fine, and an opportunity has been
afforded the alleged violator to appear before the registry or otherwise offer
evidence as he may choose in mitigation of the imposition of the fine.
(8) Any campaign consultant or employer who intentionally fails to register shall be
guilty of a Class D felony.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 121 IS CREATED TO
Page 10 of 11
XXXX 12/22/2025 1:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 330
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Each employer of one (1) or more campaign consultants shall pay a registration
fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) to the registry.
(2) All fees collected by the registry under the provisions of this section shall be
deposited in the State Treasury in a trust and agency fund account to the credit of
the registry. These agency funds shall be used to supplement general fund
appropriations to the registry.
Page 11 of 11
XXXX 12/22/2025 1:40 PM Jacketed